Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 728.2, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 728.2 Dissemination and exhibition of obscene material to minors. Any person eighteen years of age or older , other than the parent or guardian of the minor, who knowingly disseminates or exhibits obscene material to a minor, including the exhibition of obscene material so that it can be observed by a minor on or off the premises where it is displayed, is guilty of a public offense and shall upon conviction be guilty of a serious misdemeanor. as follows: 1. For a first offense, a serious misdemeanor. 2. For a second offense, an aggravated misdemeanor with a mandatory minimum term of confinement of one year. No portion of the mandatory minimum term of confinement imposed by this subsection shall be deferred or suspended. 3. For a third or subsequent offense, a class âDâ felony with a mandatory minimum term of confinement of three years. No portion of the mandatory minimum term of confinement imposed by this subsection shall be deferred or suspended. Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 728.2A Minors distributing obscene material to minors. House File 306, p. 2 Any person under the age of eighteen who knowingly distributes obscene material to another minor is guilty of a public offense and shall upon conviction be guilty of a serious misdemeanor. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 306, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor